District of Columbia statutes.
11-1729

Service of United States marshal.

The United States Marshal for the District of Columbia shall continue to serve the courts of the District of Columbia, subject to the supervision of the Attorney General of the United States.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 512, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-1729.
1973 Ed., § 11-1729.